Nevada, session 2025Special36, AB1.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.703, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757,
116A.270, 116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267,
119.280, 119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382,
120A.640, 120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161,
126.163, 126.730, 127.130, 127.2817, 127A.160, 127A.230,
127B.370, 127B.750, 127E.120, 128.090, 130.312, 130.712,
136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495, 179A.070,
179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772, 200.5095,
200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923, 209.3925,
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 5 –
209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040, 213.095,
213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350, 218F.150,
218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615, 223.250, 226.462,
226.796, 228.270, 228.380, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570, 231.069,
231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 232.49925, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.027, 239B.030,
239B.040, 239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250,
239C.270, 239C.420, 240.007, 240A.260, 241.020, 241.030,
241.039, 242.105, 242.1289, 242.129, 244.264, 244.335, 244.3635,
247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130, 250.140,
250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910, 269.174,
271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680, 281A.685,
281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086, 286.110,
286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830, 293.4855,
293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.57697, 293.870, 293.906,
293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110, 332.061,
332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1571, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 360.889, 360.890, 360.945, 360.950,
361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138, 366.160, 368A.180, 370.257,
370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300, 379.0075, 379.008,
379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626, 387.631, 388.1455,
388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750, 388A.247, 388A.249,
391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120, 391.925, 392.029, 392.147,
392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317, 392.325, 392.327, 392.335,
392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975, 394.1698, 394.447, 394.460,
394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143, 396.159, 396.3295, 396.405,
396.525, 396.535, 396.9685, 398.310, 398A.115, 408.3885,
408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153, 414.280, 416.070,
422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350, 422A.6772, 425.400,
427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205, 432B.175,
432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430, 432B.560,
432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360, 439.4941,
439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116, 439A.124,
439B.2839, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449A.112, 449B.180, 449B.480, 449B.580, 450.140, 450B.188,
450B.805, 453.164, 453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866,
459.555, 459.7056, 459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240,
463.3403, 463.3407, 463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 6 –
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 489.431, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031,
561.285, 571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.248, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089,
639.183, 639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640.154, 640A.185,
640A.220, 640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620,
640C.745, 640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340,
641.090, 641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262,
641A.305, 641B.170, 641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760,
641D.260, 641D.320, 642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180,
645.625, 645A.050, 645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220,
645C.225, 645D.130, 645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330,
647.0945, 647.0947, 648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126,
652.228, 653.900, 654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130,
665.133, 669.275, 669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415,
673.450, 673.480, 675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243,
678A.470, 678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159,
679B.190, 679B.285, 679B.480, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440,
681B.260, 681B.410, 681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289,
686B.170, 686C.306, 687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010,
688C.230, 688C.480, 688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190,
692C.3507, 692C.3536, 692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420,
693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550, 696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325,
706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159, 711.600, and section 1.3 of this act,
sections 35, 38 and 41 of chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and
section 2 of chapter 391, Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless
otherwise declared by law to be confidential, all public books and
public records of a governmental entity must be open at all times
during office hours to inspection by any person, and may be fully
copied or an abstract or memorandum may be prepared from those
public books and public records. Any such copies, abstracts or
memoranda may be used to supply the general public with copies,
abstracts or memoranda of the records or may be used in any other
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 7 –
way to the advantage of the governmental entity or of the general
public. This section does not supersede or in any manner affect the
federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge, diminish or affect in
any other manner the rights of a person in any written book or
record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 8 –
Sec. 1.3. Chapter 241 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A meeting between an agency or officer of the Executive
Department of the State Government and the Legislature that is
held to discuss a threat to:
(a) The security of public facilities and essential public
services, including, without limitation, water, drinking water,
wastewater treatment, natural gas services and electric services;
(b) The ability of the public to access public services or public
facilities; or
(c) Critical infrastructure controls or critical infrastructure
information relating to cybersecurity,
 must be a closed meeting and is not subject to any other
provision of this chapter.
2. All information and materials received during a meeting
described in subsection 1 or prepared for a meeting described in
subsection 1 and all minutes and audiovisual or electronic
reproductions of such a meeting are confidential, are not subject
to subpoena or discovery and are not subject to inspection by the
general public.
3. Any person who attends a closed meeting described in
subsection 1 shall not disclose any information or materials
received in preparation for or during such a meeting to any person
who is not in the Executive Department of State Government or
the Legislature.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Critical infrastructure controls” means networks and
systems that control assets so vital to the State that the incapacity
or destruction of those networks, systems or assets would debilitate
public health, safety or economic security.
(b) “Critical infrastructure information” means information
not customarily in the public domain pertaining to:
(1) Actual, potential or threatened interference with, attack
on, compromise of or incapacitation of critical infrastructure
controls by physical or electronic means, including, without
limitation, the misuse of or unauthorized access to
communications systems and data transmission systems in a
manner that violates, federal, state or local law or harms public
health, safety or economic security;
(2) The ability of a critical infrastructure control to resist
any interference with or compromise or incapacitation of the
critical infrastructure control, including, without limitation, any
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 9 –
planned or past assessment or estimate of the vulnerability of
critical infrastructure control; or
(3) To the extent it is related to interference, compromise or
incapacitation of critical infrastructure controls, any previous
problem or planned or previous solution relating to critical
infrastructure controls, including, without limitation, repairs,
system recovery or reconstruction, insurance or continuity.
(c) “Legislature” means:
(1) The Legislature or either House;
(2) Any committee of either House;
(3) Any joint committee of both Houses;
(4) Any other committee or commission created or
authorized by the Legislature to conduct or perform legislative
business at the direction of or on behalf of the Legislature; or
(5) Any officer or employee of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau,
 The term includes, without limitation, any interim, advisory or
other committee or subcommittee.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 241.016 is hereby amended to read as follows:
241.016 1. The meetings of a public body that are quasi-
judicial in nature are subject to the provisions of this chapter.
2. The following are exempt from the requirements of this
chapter:
(a) The Legislature of the State of Nevada.
(b) Judicial proceedings, including, without limitation,
proceedings before the Commission on Judicial Selection and,
except as otherwise provided in NRS 1.4687, the Commission on
Judicial Discipline.
(c) Meetings of the State Board of Parole Commissioners when
acting to grant, deny, continue or revoke the parole of a prisoner or
to establish or modify the terms of the parole of a prisoner.
3. Any provision of law, including, without limitation, NRS
91.270, 219A.210, 223.966, 226.778, 228.495, 239C.140,
239C.420, 241.028, 281A.350, 281A.690, 281A.735, 281A.760,
284.3629, 286.150, 287.0415, 287.04345, 287.338, 288.220,
288.590, 289.387, 293.252, 295.121, 295.217, 315.7821, 315.98425,
360.247, 388.261, 388.385, 388A.495, 388C.150, 388D.355,
388G.710, 388G.730, 392.147, 392.466, 392.467, 392.4671,
394.1699, 396.1415, 396.3295, 414.270, 422.405, 427A.940,
433.534, 435.610, 442.774, 450.140, 450.635, 463.110, 480.545,
622.320, 622.340, 630.311, 630.336, 631.3635, 639.050, 642.518,
642.557, 686B.170, 696B.550, 703.196 and 706.1725, and section
1.3 of this act, which:
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 10 –
(a) Provides that any meeting, hearing or other proceeding is not
subject to the provisions of this chapter; or
(b) Otherwise authorizes or requires a closed meeting, hearing
or proceeding,
 prevails over the general provisions of this chapter.
4. The exceptions provided to this chapter, and a remote
technology system or electronic communication, must not be used to
circumvent the spirit or letter of this chapter to deliberate or act,
outside of an open and public meeting, upon a matter over which the
public body has supervision, control, jurisdiction or advisory
powers.
Sec. 1.7. Chapter 242 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 8, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. 1. The Security Operations Center shall develop
policies and procedures to:
(a) Combat the increasing threats to using agencies posed by
cybercriminals;
(b) Protect sensitive data in the possession of a using agency;
and
(c) Ensure a coordinated and rapid response to any
cybersecurity incident that affects a using agency.
2. The policies and procedures developed pursuant to
subsection 1 must include, without limitation:
(a) A requirement that a using agency notify the Security
Operations Center of any specific or immediate threat to the
cybersecurity of an information system operated or maintained by
the using agency;
(b) A requirement that the Security Operations Center notify
the appropriate law enforcement agency and prosecuting attorney
and any other appropriate public or private entity of any specific
threat to the cybersecurity of an information system of which the
Security Operations Center has been notified;
(c) A strategy for developing ongoing programs for
professional development in cybersecurity for the employees of a
using agency; and
(d) The use of security orchestration automation and response
systems to automate repetitive tasks, enhance operational
efficiency and standardize procedures and responses for the
various information technology support of using agencies.
Sec. 3. If a using agency does not comply with the
cybersecurity policies and protocols developed by the Security
Operations Center pursuant to section 2 of this act, the Chief may
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 11 –
impose additional oversight or audit requirements on the using
agency relating to cybersecurity.
Sec. 4. 1. The Account for the Security Operations Center
is hereby created in the State General Fund. The Chief must
administer the Account.
2. The money in the Account must only be used for the
purposes of supporting and carrying out the duties of the Security
Operations Center.
3. The Chief may apply for and accept federal grants for the
purposes of this section.
4. The Security Operations Center may serve as a fiscal agent
to pool federal grant funds for the purposes of cybersecurity
support and infrastructure development. The Security Operations
Center may establish criteria for using agencies to access shared
resources which must ensure equitable distribution of the
resources and maximize competiveness for federal opportunities.
5. All interest earned on the money in the Account, after
deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the Account.
6. All claims against the Account must be paid as other
claims against the State are paid.
7. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund and must be carried
forward to the next fiscal year.
Sec. 5. The Security Operations Center shall collaborate with
the Office of Information Security and Cyber Defense created by
NRS 242.080 to enhance communication and coordination of
incident responses to cyber threats or cyberattacks on information
systems and to provide each using agency information relating to
emerging cyber threats and best practices for cybersecurity.
Sec. 6. 1. On or before January 1 of each year, the Security
Operations Center shall prepare a report assessing the
effectiveness of the Security Operations Center relating to its
duties. The report must include, without limitation:
(a) A summary of the progress made by the Security
Operations Center during the immediately preceding year in
performing its duties and exercising such powers as are conferred
upon it;
(b) A general description of any threats or attacks responded to
by the Security Operations Center during the immediately
preceding year, and a summary of the response to the threat;
(c) A summary of the goals and objectives of the Security
Operations Center for the upcoming year;
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 12 –
(d) A summary of any issues presenting challenges to the
Security Operations Center; and
(e) Any other information that the Chief determines is
appropriate to include in the report.
2. The report required pursuant to subsection 1 must be
submitted not later than July 1 of each year to the Governor,
Attorney General and Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
for transmission to the Legislature.
Sec. 7. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to impair
or affect existing agreements with a federally recognized Indian
tribe. Any interlocal agreement entered into with the governing
body of an Indian tribe, group of tribes, organized segment of a
tribe or any organization representing two or more such entities
must respect sovereign governance and provide for jointly agreed
upon data protocols.
Sec. 8. To the extent that funding is available:
1. The Security Operations Center shall, in collaboration with
the Nevada System of Higher Education, develop the
Cybersecurity Talent Pipeline Program. The Program must
develop a system for the career development of students in the
field of computer science or cybersecurity.
2. The Program must provide opportunities for students
within the Nevada System of Higher Education who are majoring
in a field related to cybersecurity to obtain working experience in
the Security Operations Center.
Sec. 9. NRS 242.055 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.055 “Information service” means any service provided by
the Office to a using agency relating to the creation, maintenance,
operation, security validation, testing, continuous monitoring or use
of an information system. The term includes, without limitation,
the real-time monitoring of cyberinfrastructure, threat mitigation,
incident response and cybersecurity enforcement.
Sec. 10. NRS 242.061 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.061 “Local governmental agency” means [any] :
1. Any branch, agency, bureau, board, commission, department
or division of a county, incorporated city or town in this State [.] ;
or
2. The board of trustees of a school district.
Sec. 11. NRS 242.068 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.068 “Using agency” means [an agency of the State which
has a function requiring the use of information technology,
information services or an information system.] :
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 13 –
1. A state agency or elected state officer who is required to
use the services and equipment of the Office pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 242.131.
2. Any other state agency or local governmental agency that
has negotiated with the Office for its services or equipment
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 242.131.
Sec. 12. NRS 242.071 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.071 1. The Legislature hereby determines and declares
that the creation of the Governor’s Technology Office within the
Office of the Governor is necessary for the secure, coordinated,
orderly and economical processing of data and information in State
Government, to ensure the secure and economical use of
information systems and to prevent the unnecessary proliferation of
equipment and personnel among the various state agencies.
2. The purposes of the Office are:
(a) To perform information services for [state] using agencies.
(b) To provide technical advice but not administrative control of
the information systems within the [state] using agencies . [and, as
authorized, of local governmental agencies.]
Sec. 13. NRS 242.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.080 1. The Governor’s Technology Office is hereby
created within the Office of the Governor.
2. The Office consists of the Chief Information Officer and:
(a) The Director’s Office. The Chief is the head of the Director’s
Office.
(b) The Client Services Division.
(c) The Computing Services Division.
(d) The Network Services Division.
(e) The Office of Information Security and Cyber Defense.
(f) Other units, groups, divisions or departments deemed
necessary by the Chief to the extent such functions are supported by
the appropriations allocated to the functions of the Office.
3. A Network Transport Services Unit and a Unified
Communications Unit are hereby created within the Network
Services Division of the Office.
4. The Security Operations Center is hereby created within
the Office of Information Security and Cyber Defense.
Sec. 14. NRS 242.105 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.105 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
records and portions of records that are assembled, maintained,
overseen or prepared by the Office to mitigate, prevent or respond to
cybersecurity incidents or acts of terrorism, the public disclosure of
which would, in the determination of the Chief, create a substantial
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 14 –
likelihood of threatening the cybersecurity of a using agency or the
safety of the general public are confidential and not subject to
inspection by the general public to the extent that such records and
portions of records consist of or include:
(a) Information regarding the infrastructure and security of
information systems, including, without limitation:
(1) Access codes, passwords and programs used to ensure the
security of an information system;
(2) Access codes used to ensure the security of software
applications;
(3) Procedures and processes used to ensure the security of
an information system; and
(4) Plans used to re-establish security and service with
respect to an information system after security has been breached or
service has been interrupted.
(b) Assessments and plans that relate specifically and uniquely
to the vulnerability of an information system or to the measures
which will be taken to respond to such vulnerability, including,
without limitation, any compiled underlying data necessary to
prepare such assessments and plans.
(c) The results of tests of the security of an information system,
insofar as those results reveal specific vulnerabilities relative to the
information system.
2. The Chief shall maintain or cause to be maintained a list of
each record or portion of a record that the Chief has determined to
be confidential pursuant to subsection 1. The list described in this
subsection must be prepared and maintained so as to recognize the
existence of each such record or portion of a record without
revealing the contents thereof.
3. At least once each biennium, the Chief shall review the list
described in subsection 2 and shall, with respect to each record or
portion of a record that the Chief has determined to be confidential
pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) Determine that the record or portion of a record remains
confidential in accordance with the criteria set forth in subsection 1;
(b) Determine that the record or portion of a record is no longer
confidential in accordance with the criteria set forth in subsection 1;
or
(c) If the Chief determines that the record or portion of a record
is obsolete, cause the record or portion of a record to be disposed of
in the manner described in NRS 239.073 to 239.125, inclusive.
4. On or before February 15 of each year, the Chief shall:
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 15 –
(a) Prepare a report setting forth a detailed description of each
record or portion of a record determined to be confidential pursuant
to this section, if any, accompanied by an explanation of why each
such record or portion of a record was determined to be confidential;
and
(b) Submit a copy of the report to the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(1) If the Legislature is in session, the standing committees
of the Legislature which have jurisdiction of the subject matter; or
(2) If the Legislature is not in session, the Legislative
Commission.
5. As used in this section, “act of terrorism” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 239C.030.
Sec. 15. NRS 242.111 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.111 The Chief shall adopt regulations necessary for the
administration of this chapter, including:
1. The policy for the information systems of [the Executive
Branch of Government, excluding the Nevada System of Higher
Education and the Nevada Criminal Justice Information System,]
using agencies, as that policy relates, but is not limited, to such
items as standards for systems and programming and criteria for
selection, location and use of information systems to meet the
requirements of [state] using agencies and officers [at] in the [least
cost to] best interests of the State [;] and using agencies;
2. The procedures of the Office in providing information
services, which may include provision for the performance, by [an]
a using agency which uses the services or equipment of the Office,
of preliminary procedures, such as data recording and verification,
within the using agency;
3. The effective administration of the Office, including,
without limitation, security to prevent unauthorized access to
information systems and plans for the recovery of systems and
applications after they have been disrupted;
4. The development of standards to ensure the security of the
information systems of the [Executive Branch of Government;]
using agencies;
5. Specifications and standards for the employment of all
personnel of the Office; and
6. The policies and procedures necessary to coordinate the
cybersecurity activities of state agencies and local governments.
Sec. 16. NRS 242.131 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.131 1. The Office shall provide state agencies and
elected state officers with all their required design of information
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 16 –
systems. The Security Operations Center shall provide each state
agency and elected state officer with cybersecurity services,
including, without limitation, real-time monitoring of
cyberinfrastructure, threat mitigation, incident response and
cybersecurity enforcement. All agencies and officers must use those
services and equipment, except as otherwise provided in
subsection 2.
2. The following agencies may negotiate with the Office for its
services , including, without limitation, cybersecurity services,
including, without limitation, real-time monitoring of
cyberinfrastructure, threat mitigation, incident response and
cybersecurity enforcement, or the use of its equipment, subject to
the provisions of this chapter, and the Office shall provide those
services and the use of that equipment as may be mutually agreed:
(a) The Court Administrator;
(b) The Department of Motor Vehicles;
(c) The Department of Public Safety;
(d) The Department of Transportation;
(e) The Employment Security Division of the Department of
Employment, Training and Rehabilitation;
(f) The Department of Wildlife;
(g) The Housing Division of the Department of Business and
Industry;
(h) The Legislative Counsel Bureau;
(i) The State Controller;
(j) The Nevada Gaming Control Board and Nevada Gaming
Commission; [and]
(k) The Nevada System of Higher Education [.] ; and
(l) Any local governmental agency.
3. Any state agency or elected state officer who uses the
services of the Office and desires to withdraw substantially from
that use must apply to the Chief for approval. The application must
set forth justification for the withdrawal. If the Chief denies the
application, the agency or officer must:
(a) If the Legislature is in regular or special session, obtain the
approval of the Legislature by concurrent resolution.
(b) If the Legislature is not in regular or special session, obtain
the approval of the Interim Finance Committee. The Chief shall,
within 45 days after receipt of the application, forward the
application together with his or her recommendation for approval or
denial to the Interim Finance Committee. The Interim Finance
Committee has 45 days after the application and recommendation
are submitted to its Secretary within which to consider the
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 17 –
application. Any application which is not considered by the
Committee within the 45-day period shall be deemed approved.
4. Any local governmental agency and any state agency that
is not an agency of the Executive Department of the State
Government which has entered into an agreement to use the
equipment or services of the Office and desires to withdraw
substantially from that use must, not less than 120 days before the
next regular session of the Legislature, notify the Chief of the
intent of the agency to so withdraw. The notification must:
(a) Set forth the justification for the withdrawal; and
(b) Unless a later date is approved by the Chief, set a date, not
earlier than July 1 of the next fiscal year, for termination of the
use of the equipment or services of the Office.
5. If the demand for services or use of equipment exceeds the
capability of the Office to provide them, the Office may contract
with other agencies or independent contractors to furnish the
required services or use of equipment and is responsible for the
administration of the contracts.
Sec. 17. NRS 242.151 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.151 The Chief shall advise the using agencies regarding:
1. The policy for information services of the [Executive Branch
of Government,] Office, as that policy relates, but is not limited, to
such items as standards for systems and programming and criteria
for the selection, location and use of information systems in order
that the requirements of [state agencies and officers] using agencies
may be met [at the least cost to] in the best interests of the State;
2. The procedures in performing information services; and
3. The effective administration and use of the computer
facility, including security to prevent unauthorized access to data,
information and plans for the recovery of systems and applications
after they have been disrupted.
Sec. 18. NRS 242.161 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.161 1. All equipment of [an agency or elected state
officer] a using agency which is owned or leased by the State must
be under the managerial control of the Office, except the equipment
of the agencies and officers specified in subsection 2 of
NRS 242.131.
2. The Office may permit [an] a using agency which is
required to use such equipment to operate it on the using agency’s
premises.
3. The Security Operations Center shall not assume
operational control of the equipment or software systems of a
using agency. Before providing services, the Security Operations
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 18 –
Center shall provide to the using agency standards and policies for
the equipment or software systems to be deployed by the Security
Operations Center, which must be agreed upon in writing.
Sec. 19. NRS 242.171 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.171 1. The Office is responsible for:
(a) The applications of information systems;
(b) Designing and placing those information systems in
operation;
(c) Any application of an information system which it furnishes
to [state] using agencies [and officers] after negotiation; and
(d) The security validation, testing, including, without
limitation, penetration testing, and continuous monitoring of
information systems,
 for using agencies . [and for state agencies and officers which use
the equipment or services of the Office pursuant to subsection 2 of
NRS 242.131.]
2. The Chief shall review and approve or disapprove, pursuant
to standards for justifying cost, any application of an information
system having an estimated developmental cost of $50,000 or more.
No using agency may commence development work on any such
applications until approval and authorization have been obtained
from the Chief.
3. As used in this section, “penetration testing” means a
method of evaluating the security of an information system or
application of an information system by simulating unauthorized
access to the information system or application.
Sec. 20. NRS 242.181 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.181 1. Any [state agency or elected state officer] using
agency which uses the equipment or services of the Office shall
adhere to the regulations, standards, practices, policies and
conventions of the Office.
2. Each [state] using agency [or elected state officer described
in subsection 1] shall report any suspected incident of:
(a) [Unauthorized access to an information system or application
of an information system of the Office used by the state agency or
elected state officer; and] A data breach;
(b) A distributed denial of service incident;
(c) A ransomware incident;
(d) Any other incident that disrupts the delivery or essential
services for more than 1 business day or directly affects life or
property; or
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 19 –
(e) Noncompliance with the regulations, standards, practices,
policies and conventions of the Office that is identified by the Office
as security-related,
 to the Office of Information Security and Cyber Defense of the
Office and the Security Operations Center within 24 hours after
discovery of the suspected incident. If the Office of Information
Security and Cyber Defense , in consultation with the Security
Operations Center, determines that an incident of unauthorized
access or noncompliance occurred, it shall immediately report the
incident to the Chief. The Chief shall assist in the investigation and
resolution of any such incident.
3. A report submitted by a using agency pursuant to
subsection 2 must contain the following information:
(a) The date and time of the incident;
(b) The type of incident;
(c) The type of information system or data affected by the
incident;
(d) The known and projected impact of the incident to the
using agency;
(e) Whether law enforcement, a regulatory body or any other
entity that could be affected by the incident has been notified, as
applicable; and
(f) Any additional resources needed by the using agency to
respond to the incident, as applicable.
4. The Chief may establish a uniform reporting system if the
Office and Security Operations Center are organizationally
collocated.
5. The Office shall provide services to each [state] using
agency [and elected state officer described in subsection 1]
uniformly with respect to degree of service, priority of service,
availability of service and cost of service.
Sec. 21. NRS 242.183 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.183 1. The Deputy Director of the Office of Information
Security and Cyber Defense , in consultation with the Security
Operations Center, shall investigate and resolve any breach of an
information system of a [state] using agency [or elected officer that
uses the equipment or services of the Governor’s Technology
Office] or an application of such an information system or
unauthorized acquisition of computerized data that materially
compromises the security, confidentiality or integrity of such an
information system.
2. The Chief Information Officer or Deputy Director of the
Office of Information Security and Cyber Defense, at his or her
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 20 –
discretion, may inform members of the Nevada Commission on
Homeland Security created by NRS 239C.120 and the Information
Technology Advisory Board created by NRS 242.122 of any breach
of an information system of a [state] using agency [or elected
officer] or application of such an information system or
unauthorized acquisition of computerized data or information that
materially compromises the security, confidentiality or integrity of
such an information system.
3. If a state of emergency or declaration of disaster is
proclaimed by the Governor pursuant to NRS 414.070 concerning
a critical cybersecurity incident, the Governor may authorize the
information technology personnel of using agencies of the
Executive Branch to report directly to the Chief.
Sec. 22. NRS 242.191 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.191 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the
amount receivable from a [state] using agency [or officer or local
governmental agency] which uses the services or equipment of the
Office must be determined by the Chief in each case and include:
(a) The annual expense, including depreciation, of operating and
maintaining the Network Services Division [,] and the cybersecurity
services provided by the Security Operations Center, distributed
among the agencies in proportion to the services performed for each
agency.
(b) A service charge in an amount determined by distributing the
monthly installment for the construction costs of the computer
facility among the agencies in proportion to the services performed
for each agency.
2. The Chief shall prepare and submit monthly to the [state
agencies and officers and local governmental] using agencies for
which services of the Office have been performed an itemized
statement of the amount receivable from each [state] using agency .
[or officer or local governmental agency.]
3. The Chief may authorize, if in his or her judgment the
circumstances warrant, a fixed cost billing, including a factor for
depreciation, for services rendered to a [state] using agency . [or
officer or local governmental agency.]
Sec. 23. NRS 242.211 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.211 1. The Fund for Information Services is hereby
created as an internal service fund. Money from the Fund must be
paid out on claims as other claims against the State are paid. The
claims must be made in accordance with budget allotments and are
subject to postaudit examination and approval.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 21 –
2. [All] Except as otherwise provided in section 4 of this act,
all operating, maintenance, rental, repair and replacement costs of
equipment and all salaries of personnel assigned to the Office must
be paid from the Fund.
3. Each using agency using the services or equipment of the
Office shall pay a fee for that use to the Fund, which must be set by
the Chief in an amount sufficient to reimburse the Office for the
entire cost of providing those services, including overhead. Each
using agency shall budget for those services. All fees, proceeds from
the sale of equipment and any other money received by the Office
must be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the Fund.
Sec. 24. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor
for the Governor’s Technology Office within the Office of the
Governor for investments related to cybersecurity the following
sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $6,458,457
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $3,420,682
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
3. The Governor’s Technology Office is encouraged to, in
collaboration with other agencies, identify and apply for grants for
investments related to cybersecurity. If the Governor’s Technology
Office receives any such grant, an amount of money that is not less
than the amount of the grant but not more than the appropriation set
forth in subsection 1 must be reserved for reversion to the State
General Fund unless doing so violates the terms or conditions for
the Office to receive the grant.
Sec. 25. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor
for a loan to the Governor’s Technology Office within the Office of
the Governor to cover a shortfall in revenues for the Client Services
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 22 –
Division within the Governor’s Technology Office the following
sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,005,840
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,359,317
2. The amounts appropriated by subsection 1 are loans.
Commencing on July 1, 2027, the Chief Information Officer shall
use revenues from intergovernmental transfers to repay the loan in
annual installments to the State Treasurer for deposit in the State
General Fund. Each annual installment must be 25 percent of the
loan, and the loan must be fully repaid not later than the end of
Fiscal Year 2030-2031.
3. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 26. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor
for a loan to the Governor’s Technology Office within the Office of
the Governor to cover a shortfall in revenues for the Computing
Services Division within the Governor’s Technology Office the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,063,637
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,063,637
2. The amounts appropriated by subsection 1 are loans.
Commencing on July 1, 2027, the Chief Information Officer shall
use revenues from intergovernmental transfers to repay the loan in
annual installments to the State Treasurer for deposit in the State
General Fund. Each annual installment must be 25 percent of the
loan, and the loan must be fully repaid not later than the end of
Fiscal Year 2030-2031.
3. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 23 –
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 27. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of Finance in the Office of the Governor
for a loan to the Governor’s Technology Office within the Office of
the Governor to cover a shortfall in revenues for the Office of
Information Security and Cyber Defense within the Governor’s
Technology Office the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $184,018
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $70,431
2. The amounts appropriated by subsection 1 are loans.
Commencing on July 1, 2027, the Chief Information Officer shall
use revenues from intergovernmental transfers to repay the loan in
annual installments to the State Treasurer for deposit in the State
General Fund. Each annual installment must be 25 percent of the
loan, and the loan must be fully repaid not later than the end of
Fiscal Year 2030-2031.
3. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 28. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 29. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 218D.430 and
218D.435, a committee may vote on this act before the expiration of
the period prescribed for the return of a fiscal note in
NRS 218D.475. This section applies retroactively from and after
November 13, 2025.
Sec. 30. NRS 242.141 is hereby repealed.
-
36th Special Session (2025)

– 24 –
Sec. 31. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
36th Special Session (2025)